North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act
19-03.1-05.
Schedule I.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule I.

Schedule I consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of those isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetylmethadol.

Allylprodine.

Alphacetylmethadol.

Alphameprodine.

Alphamethadol.

Benzethidine.

Betacetylmethadol.

Betameprodine.

Betamethadol.

Betaprodine.

Clonitazene.

Dextromoramide.

Diampromide.

Diethylthiambutene.

Difenoxin.

Dimenoxadol.

Dimepheptanol.

Dimethylthiambutene.

Dioxaphetyl butyrate.

Dipipanone.

Ethylmethylthiambutene.

Etonitazene.

Etoxeridine.

Furethidine.

Hydroxypethidine.

Ketobemidone.

Levomoramide.

Levophenacylmorphan.

Morpheridine.

MPPP (also known as 1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine).

Noracymethadol.

Norlevorphanol.

Normethadone.

Norpipanone.

PEPAP (1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-Phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine).

Phenadoxone.

Phenampromide.

Phenomorphan.

Phenoperidine.

Piritramide.

Proheptazine.

Properidine.

Propiram.

Racemoramide.

Tilidine.

Trimeperidine.

3,4-dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide (also known as U-47700).

1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine (also know as MT-45).

3,4-dichloro-N-{[1-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]methyl}benzamide (also known as AH-7921).

Fentanyl derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule or are not FDA approved drugs, and are derived from N-(1-(2-Phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide (Fentanyl) by any substitution on or replacement of the phenethyl group, any substitution on the piperidine ring, any substitution on or replacement of the propanamide group, any substitution on the anilido phenyl group, or any combination of the above. Examples include:

N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide (also known as Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl).

N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine (also known as Alpha-methylfentanyl).

N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as Alpha-methylthiofentanyl).

N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as Beta-hydroxyfentanyl).

N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl).

N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as 3-Methylfentanyl).

N-[3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as 3-Methylthiofentanyl).

N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also known as Para-fluorofentanyl).

N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]propanamide (also known as Thiofentanyl).

N-(1-phenylethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide (also known as Furanyl Fentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide; N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide (also known as Butyryl Fentanyl).

N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide; N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl]-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide (also known as Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as Acetyl Fentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide (also known as Acryl Fentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide (also known as Valeryl Fentanyl).

N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known as 4-Fluoroisobutyryl Fentanyl).

N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide (also known as Ortho-fluorofentanyl, 2-Fluorofentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-carboxamide (also known as Tetrahydrofuranyl Fentanyl).

2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide (also known as Methoxyacetyl Fentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide (also known as Cyclopropyl Fentanyl).

N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide (also known as Ocfentanil).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide (also known as Cyclopentyl Fentanyl).

N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide (also known as Isobutyryl Fentanyl).

N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide (also known as Para-chloroisobutyryl Fentanyl).

N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known as Para-methoxybutyryl Fentanyl).

N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide (also known as Para-fluorobutyryl Fentanyl).

Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Acetorphine.

Acetyldihydrocodeine.

Benzylmorphine.

Codeine methylbromide.

Codeine-N-Oxide.

Cyprenorphine.

Desomorphine.

Dihydromorphine.

Drotebanol.

Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt).

Heroin.

Hydromorphinol.

Methyldesorphine.

Methyldihydromorphine.

Morphine methylbromide.

Morphine methylsulfonate.

Morphine-N-Oxide.

Myrophine.

Nicocodeine.

Nicomorphine.

Normorphine.

Pholcodine.

Thebacon.

Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for purposes of this subsection only, the term “isomer” includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers):

Alpha-ethyltryptamine, its optical isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (also known as etryptamine; a-ethyl-1 H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl) indole).

Alpha-methyltryptamine.

4-methoxyamphetamine (also known as 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine; PMA).

N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenylamine, and N-hydroxy MDA.

Ibogaine (also known as 7-Ethyl-6, 6 B, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5 H-pyrido [1’, 2’:1,2] azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga).

Lysergic acid diethylamide.

Marijuana.

Parahexyl (also known as 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetrahydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6 H-dibenzol[b,d]pyran; Synhexyl).

Peyote (all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds, or its extracts).

N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate.

N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate.

Psilocybin.

Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such plant, including synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant; such as the following:

Delta-1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers. Other names: Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol.

Delta-3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers.

Tetrahydrocannabinols do not include:

The allowable amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol found in hemp as defined in chapter 4.1-18.1; or

A prescription drug approved by the United States food and drug administration under section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355].

Cannabinoids, synthetic. It includes the chemicals and chemical groups listed below, including their homologues, salts, isomers, and salts of isomers. The term “isomer” includes the optical, position, and geometric isomers.

Indole carboxaldehydes. Any compound structurally derived from 1 H-indole-3-carboxaldehyde or 1 H-2-carboxaldehyde substituted in both of the following ways: at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at the hydrogen of the carboxaldehyde by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is further modified to any extent in the following ways:

Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or

Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, pyrrolidinyl, piperazinyl, or propionaldehyde group to any extent; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or cyclopropyl ring.

Examples include:

1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-018 and AM-678.

1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-073.

1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-081.

1-[2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl]-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-200.

1-Propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-015.

1-Hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-019.

1-Pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-122.

1-Pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-210.

1-Pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: JWH-398.

1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole-Other names: AM-2201.

1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole-Other names: RCS-8.

1-Pentyl-3-(2-methoxyphenylacetyl)indole-Other names: JWH-250.

1-Pentyl-3-(2-methylphenylacetyl)indole-Other names: JWH-251.

1-Pentyl-3-(2-chlorophenylacetyl)indole-Other names: JWH-203.

1-Pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole-Other names: RCS-4.

(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-iodobenzoyl)indole)-Other names: AM-694.

(4-Methoxyphenyl)-[2-methyl-1-(2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl)indol-3-yl]methanone-Other names: WIN 48,098 and Pravadoline.

(1-Pentylindol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone—Other names: UR-144.

(1-(5-fluoropentyl)indol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone-Other names: XLR-11.

(1-(2-morpholin-4-ylethyl)-1 H-indol-3-yl)-(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone-Other names: A-796,260.

(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazol-3-yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone—Other names: THJ-2201.

1-naphthalenyl(1-pentyl-1 H-indazol-3-yl)-methanone—Other names: THJ-018.

(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-yl)(naphthalen-1-yl)methanone-Other names: FUBIMINA.

1-[(N-methylpiperidin-2-yl)methyl]-3-(adamant-1-oyl) indole-Other names: AM-1248.

1-Pentyl-3-(1-adamantoyl)indole-Other names: AB-001 and JWH-018 adamantyl analog.

Indole carboxamides. Any compound structurally derived from 1 H-indole-3-carboxamide or 1 H-2-carboxamide substituted in both of the following ways: at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at the nitrogen of the carboxamide by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is further modified to any extent in the following ways:

Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or

Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group to any extent; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or cyclopropyl ring.

Examples include:

N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1 H-indole-3-carboxamide-Other names: JWH-018 adamantyl carboxamide, APICA, SDB-001, and 2 NE1.

N-Adamantyl-1-fluoropentylindole-3-carboxamide-Other names: STS-135.

N-Adamantyl-1-pentyl-1 H-Indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: AKB 48 and APINACA.

N-1-naphthalenyl-1-pentyl-1 H-indole-3-carboxamide-Other names: NNEI and MN-24.

N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1 H-indole-3-carboxamide-Other names: ADBICA.

(S)-N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: AB-PINACA.

N-[(1 S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-[(4-fluorophenyl)methyl]-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: AB-FUBINACA.

N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: 5-Fluoro AB-PINACA and 5 F-AB-PINACA.

N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: ADB-PINACA.

N-[(1 S)-1-(aminocarbonyl)-2-methylpropyl]-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: AB-CHMINACA.

N-(1-Amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: ADB-FUBINACA.

N-((3 s,5 s,7 s)-adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: FUB-AKB48 and AKB48 N-(4-fluorobenzyl) analog.

1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(quinolin-8-yl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: 5-fluoro-THJ.

methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate-Other names: 5-fluoro AMB and 5 F-AMB.

methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate-Other names: FUB-AMB, MMB-FUBINACA, and AMB-FUBINACA.

N-[1-(aminocarbonyl)-2,2-dimethylpropyl]-1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: MAB-CHMINACA and ADB-CHMINACA.

Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate-Other names: 5 F-ADB and 5 F-MDMB-PINACA.

N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: 5 F-APINACA and 5 F-AKB48.

Methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate-Other names: MDMB-CHMICA and MMB-CHMINACA.

Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate-Other names: MDMB-FUBINACA.

1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-indazole-3-carboxamide-Other names: 4-CN-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-cyano-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-CN-CUMYL BINACA; CUMYL-4 CN-BINACA; SGT-78.

methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate-Other names: MMB-CHMICA, AMB-CHMICA.

1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1 H-pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide-Other names: 5 F-CUMYL-P7 AICA.

Indole carboxylic acids. Any compound structurally derived from 1 H-indole-3-carboxylic acid or 1 H-2-carboxylic acid substituted in both of the following ways: at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, tetrahydropyranylmethyl, benzyl, or halo benzyl group; and, at the hydroxyl group of the carboxylic acid by a phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, or propionaldehyde group whether or not the compound is further modified to any extent in the following ways:

Substitution to the indole ring to any extent; or

Substitution to the phenyl, benzyl, cumyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, cyclopropyl, propionaldehyde group to any extent; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the indole ring; or

A nitrogen heterocyclic analog of the phenyl, benzyl, naphthyl, adamantyl, or cyclopropyl ring.

Examples include:

1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester-Other names: BB-22 and QUCHIC.

naphthalen-1-yl 1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxylate-Other names: FDU-PB-22.

1-pentyl-1 H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester-Other names: PB-22 and QUPIC.

1-(5-Fluoropentyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxylic acid 8-quinolinyl ester-Other names: 5-Fluoro PB-22 and 5 F-PB-22.

quinolin-8-yl-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxylate-Other names: FUB-PB-22.

naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1 H-indole-3-carboxylate-Other names: NM2201 and CBL2201.

Naphthylmethylindoles. Any compound containing a 1 H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl group whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include:

1-Pentyl-1 H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane-Other names: JWH-175.

1-Pentyl-1 H-indol-3-yl-(4-methyl-1-naphthyl)methane-Other names: JWH-184.

Naphthoylpyrroles. Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl group whether or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include: (5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-pentylpyrrol-3-yl)-naphthalen-1-ylmethanone-Other names: JWH-307.

Naphthylmethylindenes. Any compound containing a naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2 (4 morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl group whether or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples include: E-1-[1-(1-Naphthalenylmethylene)-1 H-inden-3-yl]pentane-Other names: JWH-176.

Cyclohexylphenols. Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cyanoalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-pyrrolidinyl)methyl, 1-(N-methyl-3-morpholinyl)methyl, or (tetrahydropyran-4-yl)methyl group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples include:

5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1 R,3 S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol-Other names: CP 47,497.

5-(1,1-dimethyloctyl)-2-[(1 R,3 S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-phenol-Other names: Cannabicyclohexanol and CP 47,497 C8 homologue.

5-(1,1-dimethylheptyl)-2-[(1 R,2 R)-5-hydroxy-2-(3-hydroxypropyl)cyclohexyl]-phenol-Other names: CP 55,940.

Others specifically named:

(6 aR,10 aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6 a,7,10,10 a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol-Other names: HU-210.

(6 aS,10 aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6 a,7,10,10 a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol-Other names: Dexanabinol and HU-211.

2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone-Other names: WIN 55,212-2.

Naphthalen-1-yl-(4-pentyloxynaphthalen-1-yl)methanone-Other names: CB-13.

Substituted phenethylamines. This includes any compound, unless specifically excepted, specifically named in this schedule, or listed under a different schedule, structurally derived from phenylethan-2-amine by substitution on the phenyl ring in any of the following ways, that is to say, by substitution with a fused methylenedioxy ring, fused furan ring, or fused tetrahydrofuran ring; by substitution with two alkoxy groups; by substitution with one alkoxy and either one fused furan, tetrahydrofuran, or tetrahydropyran ring system; or by substitution with two fused ring systems from any combination of the furan, tetrahydrofuran, or tetrahydropyran ring systems.

Whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways, that is to say:

By substitution of phenyl ring by any halo, hydroxyl, alkyl, trifluoromethyl, alkoxy, or alkylthio groups;

By substitution at the 2-position by any alkyl groups; or

By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, hydroxybenzyl, methylenedioxybenzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups.

Examples include:

2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-C or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chlorophenethylamine).

2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-D or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenethylamine).

2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-E or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenethylamine).

2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-H or 2,5-Dimethoxyphenethylamine).

2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-I or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine).

2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-N or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitrophenethylamine).

2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-P or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-propylphenethylamine).

2-[4-(Ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (also known as 2 C-T-2 or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylthiophenethylamine).

2-[4-(Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (also known as 2 C-T-4 or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-isopropylthiophenethylamine).

2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-B or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromophenethylamine).

2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(methylthio)phenyl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-T or 4-methylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine).

1-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenyl)-propan-2-amine (also known as DOI or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodoamphetamine).

1-(4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-2-aminopropane (also known as DOB or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromoamphetamine).

1-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxy-phenyl)propan-2-amine (also known as DOC or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloroamphetamine).

2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (also known as 2 C-B-NBOMe; 2,5 B-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-bromo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).

2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (also known as 2 C-I-NBOMe; 2,5 I-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-iodo-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).

N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-2-(3,4,5-trimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (also known as mescaline-NBOMe or 3,4,5-trimethoxy-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).

2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (also known as 2 C-C-NBOMe; 2,5 C-NBOMe or 2,5-Dimethoxy-4-chloro-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)phenethylamine).

2-(7-Bromo-5-methoxy-2,3-dihydro-1-benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (also known as 2 CB-5-hemiFLY).

2-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrofuro [2,3-f][1]benzofuran-4-yl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-B-FLY).

2-(10-Bromo-2,3,4,7,8,9-hexahydropyrano[2,3-g]chromen-5-yl)ethanamine (also known as 2 C-B-butterFLY).

N-(2-Methoxybenzyl)-1-(8-bromo-2,3,6,7-tetrahydrobenzo[1,2-b:4,5-b’]difuran-4-yl)-2-aminoethane (also known as 2 C-B-FLY-NBOMe).

1-(4-Bromofuro[2,3-f][1]benzofuran-8-yl)propan-2-amine (also known as bromo-benzodifuranyl-isopropylamine or bromo-dragonFLY).

N-(2-Hydroxybenzyl)-4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine (also known as 2 C-I-NBOH or 2,5 I-NBOH).

5-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran (also known as 5-APB).

6-(2-Aminopropyl)benzofuran (also known as 6-APB).

Substituted tryptamines. This includes any compound, unless specifically excepted, specifically named in this schedule, or listed under a different schedule, structurally derived from 2-(1 H-indol-3-yl)ethanamine (i.e., tryptamine) by mono-or di-substitution of the amine nitrogen with alkyl or alkenyl groups or by inclusion of the amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure whether or not the compound is further substituted at the alpha-position with an alkyl group or whether or not further substituted on the indole ring to any extent with any alkyl, alkoxy, halo, hydroxyl, or acetoxy groups. Examples include:

5-methoxy-N,N-diallyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DALT).

4-acetoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 4-AcO-DMT or O-Acetylpsilocin).

4-hydroxy-N-methyl-N-ethyltryptamine (also known as 4-HO-MET).

4-hydroxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (also known as 4-HO-DIPT).

5-methoxy-N-methyl-N-isopropyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-MiPT).

5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DMT).

Bufotenine (also known as 3-(Beta-Dimethyl-aminoethyl)-5-hydroxyindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine).

5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (also known as 5-MeO-DiPT).

Diethyltryptamine (also known as N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET).

Dimethyltryptamine (also known as DMT).

Psilocyn.

1-[3-(trifluoromethylphenyl)]piperazine (also known as TFMPP).

1-[4-(trifluoromethylphenyl)]piperazine.

6,7-dihydro-5 H-indeno-(5,6-d)-1,3-dioxol-6-amine (also known as 5,6-Methylenedioxy-2-aminoindane or MDAI).

2-(Ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanone (also known as Methoxetamine or MXE).

Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (also known as N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine, cyclohexamine, PCE).

Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (also known as 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine, PCPy, PHP).

Thiophene analog of phencyclidine (also known as (1-[1-(2-thienyl) cyclohexyl] piperidine; 2-Thienylanalog of phencyclidine; TPCP, TCP).

1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine (also known as TCPy).

Salvia divinorum, salvinorin A, or any of the active ingredients of salvia divinorum.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid.

Mecloqualone.

Methaqualone.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

Aminorex (also known as 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline, or 4,5-dihydro-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine).

Cathinone.

Substituted cathinones. Any compound, material, mixture, preparation, or other product, unless listed in another schedule or an approved food and drug administration drug (e.g., buproprion, pyrovalerone), structurally derived from 2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in any of the following ways:

By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one or more other univalent substitutents;

By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent;

By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups; or

By inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure.

3,4-Methylenedioxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as MDPPP).

3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-ethylcathinone (also known as Ethylone, MDEC, or bk-MDEA).

3,4-Methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone (also known as Methylone or bk-MDMA).

3,4-Methylenedioxypyrovalerone (also known as MDPV).

3,4-Dimethylmethcathinone (also known as 3,4-DMMC).

2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpentan-1-one (also known as Pentedrone).

2-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as 2-FMC).

3-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as 3-FMC).

4-Methylethcathinone (also known as 4-MEC and 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone).

4-Fluoromethcathinone (also known as Flephedrone and 4-FMC).

4-Methoxy-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as MOPPP).

4-Methoxymethcathinone (also known as Methedrone; bk-PMMA).

4’-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (also known as MPBP).

Alpha-methylamino-butyrophenone (also known as Buphedrone or MABP).

Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone (also known as alpha-PBP).

Alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as alpha-PPP).

Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone (also known as Alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone or alpha-PVP).

Beta-keto-N-methylbenzodioxolylbutanamine (also known as Butylone or bk-MBDB).

Ethcathinone (also known as N-Ethylcathinone).

4-Methylmethcathinone (also known as Mephedrone or 4-MMC).

Methcathinone.

N,N-dimethylcathinone (also known as metamfepramone).

Naphthylpyrovalerone (naphyrone).

B-Keto-Methylbenzodioxolylpentanamine (also known as Pentylone).

4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone (also known as 4-MePPP and MPPP).

1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one (also known as Ephylone and N-Ethylpentylone).

Fenethylline.

Fluoroamphetamine.

Fluoromethamphetamine.

cis-4-methylaminorex (also known as (1)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine).

N-Benzylpiperazine (also known as BZP, 1-benzylpiperazine).

N-ethylamphetamine.

N, N-dimethylamphetamine (also known as N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine).

(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation of atomic positions covered.)

(aa)

5-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3-dihydrobenzofuran (also known as 5-APDB).

(bb)

6-(2-Aminopropyl)-2,3,-dihydrobenzofuran (also known as 6-APDB).

(cc)

2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine (also known as 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA).

(dd)

2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (also known as DOET).

(ee)

2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (also known as 2 C-T-7).

(ff)

5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine.

(gg)

4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine (also known as 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; DOM and STP).

(hh)

3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (also known as MDA).

(ii)

3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (also known as MDMA).

(jj)

3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, MDE, MDEA).

(kk)

3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine.

(ll)

Mescaline (also known as 3,4,5-trimethoxyphenethylamine).

Some trade or other names:

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 5; 1977, ch. 194, § 2; 1979, ch. 287, § 3; 1979, ch. 288, § 1; 1985, ch. 265, § 1; 1987, ch. 264, § 1; 1989, ch. 266, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 2; 1993, ch. 220, § 2; 1995, ch. 217, § 3; 1997, ch. 123, § 3; 2001, ch. 213, § 4; 2007, ch. 208, § 1; 2007, ch. 209, § 1; 2011, ch. 161, § 1; 2013, ch. 184, § 1; 2015, ch. 169, § 1, effective March 19, 2015; 2017, ch. 163, § 1, effective March 13, 2017; 2019, ch. 185, § 2, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 173, § 2, effective April 16, 2021; 2021, ch. 172, § 2, effective May 3, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-03.1-05 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 173, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2059; and Section 2 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015 became effective March 19, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015.

19-03.1-06.
Schedule II tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule II if it finds that:

The substance has high potential for abuse;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or currently accepted medical use with severe restrictions; and

The abuse of the substance may lead to severe psychic or physical dependence.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 6; 1985, ch. 262, § 6.

19-03.1-07.
Schedule II.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule II.

Schedule II consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Substances, vegetable origin or chemical synthesis. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following substances whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, naldemedine, nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone, 6 beta-naltrexol, naltrexone, and samidorphan and their respective salts, but including the following:

Codeine.

Dihydroetorphine.

Ethylmorphine.

Etorphine hydrochloride.

Granulated opium.

Hydrocodone.

Hydromorphone.

Metopon.

Morphine.

Noroxymorphone.

Opium extracts.

Opium fluid.

Oripavine.

Oxycodone.

Oxymorphone.

Powder opium.

Raw opium.

Thebaine.

Tincture of opium.

Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in subdivision a, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.

Opium poppy and poppy straw.

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of coca leaves, including cocaine and ecgonine and their salts, isomers, derivatives, and salts of isomers and derivatives, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof that is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, except that the nondosage substances must include decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.

Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of poppy straw in either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrine alkaloids of the opium poppy).

Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the existence of those isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrophan and levopropoxyphene excepted:

Alfentanil.

Alphaprodine.

Anileridine.

Bezitramide.

Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms).

Carfentanil.

Dihydrocodeine.

Diphenoxylate.

Fentanyl.

Isomethadone.

Levo-alphaacetylmethadol (LAAM).

Levomethorphan.

Levorphanol.

Metazocine.

Methadone.

Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl butane.

Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid.

Oliceridine (N-[(3-methoxythiophen-2-yl)methyl] ({2-[(9 R)-9-(pyridin-2-yl)-6-oxaspiro [4.5]decan-9-yl]ethyl})amine fumarate).

Pethidine (also known as meperidine).

Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine.

Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate.

Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid.

Phenazocine.

Priminodine.

Racemethorphan.

Racemorphan.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:

Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its optical isomers.

Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

Phenmetrazine and its salts.

Methylphenidate.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Amobarbital.

Glutethimide.

Pentobarbital.

Phencyclidine.

Secobarbital.

Hallucinogenic substances.

Nabilone [another name for nabilone (1)-trans-3-(1, 1-dimethylheptyl)-6, 6a, 7, 8, 10, 10 a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6, 6-dimethyl-9 Hdibenzo [b, d] pyran-9-one].

Dronabinol [(-)-delta-9-trans tetrahydrocannabinol] in an oral solution in a drug product approved for marketing by the federal food and drug administration.

Immediate precursors. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances:

Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine: Phenylacetone. Some trade or other names: phenyl-2-propanone; P2P, benzyl methyl ketone; methyl benzyl ketone.

Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):

1-phenylcyclohexylamine.

1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).

Immediate precursors to fentanyl:

4-anilino-N-phenethylpiperidine (ANPP).

N -phenyl- N -(piperidin-4-yl)propionamide (norfentanyl) .

aa.

Remifentanil.

bb.

Sufentanil.

cc.

Tapentadol.

dd.

Thiafentanil.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 7; 1977, ch. 194, § 3; 1979, ch. 288, § 2; 1985, ch. 265, § 2; 1987, ch. 264, § 2; 1989, ch. 266, § 3; 1991, ch. 223, §§ 3, 4; 1997, ch. 123, § 4; 2007, ch. 208, § 2; 2009, ch. 199, § 1; 2011, ch. 161, § 2; 2017, ch. 163, § 2, effective March 13, 2017; 2019, ch. 185, § 3, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 173, § 3, effective April 16, 2021.

19-03.1-08.
Schedule III tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule III if it finds that:

The substance has a potential for abuse less than the substances listed in schedules I and II;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low physical dependence or high psychological dependence.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 8; 1985, ch. 262, § 7.